Colorado, session 2026A, SB097.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 18-7-201 as follows:
18-7-201. Commercial sexual activity - legislative declaration.
(1) AN ADULT WHO ENGAGES IN CONSENSUAL COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH ANOTHER ADULT DOES NOT VIOLATE STATE LAW
OR AN ORDINANCE, RESOLUTION, REGULATION, OR CODE ADOPTED BY A
STATUTORY OR HOME RULE CITY, TOWN, CITY AND COUNTY, OR COUNTY.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) CRIMINALIZING PROSTITUTION ENDANGERS ADULTS WHO
ENGAGE IN CONSENSUAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY. FEAR OF CRIMINAL
PUNISHMENT AMONG CONSENTING ADULTS ENGAGED IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY ENCOURAGES PHYSICAL, EMOTIONAL, AND STRUCTURAL
VIOLENCE AGAINST SEX WORKERS, SUBJECTS THEM TO ECONOMIC CRIMES,
AND INCREASES RESISTANCE TO HARM-REDUCTION PRACTICES. SEX
WORKERS ARE LESS LIKELY TO REPORT THESE CRIMES OR SEEK MEDICAL
HELP FOLLOWING AN ASSAULT.
-2- SB26-097

(b) LIKE WORKERS IN OTHER FIELDS, SEX WORKERS DESERVE THE
OPPORTUNITY TO SCREEN THEIR CLIENTS TO ENSURE A SAFE TRANSACTION.
CRIMINALIZING CLIENT CONDUCT CREATES A DISINCENTIVE FOR
PROSPECTIVE CLIENTS TO SHARE PERSONAL INFORMATION, WHICH INHIBITS
SEX WORKERS' ABILITY TO MAINTAIN THEIR SAFETY.
(c) CONSENSUAL COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY IS DISTINCT
FROM HUMAN TRAFFICKING, WHICH REMOVES THE AGENCY OF TRAFFICKED
INDIVIDUALS AND COERCES THEM INTO OFTEN HARMFUL SEXUAL
EXCHANGES. DECRIMINALIZING CONSENSUAL SEX WORK FOR ADULTS
ENABLES LAW ENFORCEMENT TO FOCUS RESOURCES ON PERPETRATORS
WHO INDUCE OTHERS TO PERFORM SEX ACTS BY FORCE, FRAUD, OR
COERCION.
(d) DECRIMINALIZING COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY AMONG
CONSENTING ADULTS IS A MATTER OF STATEWIDE CONCERN. SEX WORK
TRANSACTIONS OFTEN OCCUR ONLINE, SPANNING MULTIPLE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT JURISDICTIONS. SEX WORKERS DESERVE CLARITY AND
CERTAINTY THAT THEY CAN SAFELY CONDUCT BUSINESS WITHIN THE
STATE, REGARDLESS OF THE LOCAL GOVERNING AUTHORITY.
(e) THEREFORE, THIS SECTION PREEMPTS ANY ORDINANCE,
RESOLUTION, REGULATION, OR CODE ADOPTED BY A STATUTORY OR HOME
RULE CITY, TOWN, CITY AND COUNTY, OR COUNTY CRIMINALIZING
CONSENSUAL COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY AMONG ADULTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-7-200.3 as
follows:
18-7-200.3. Definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS PART 2, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
-3- SB26-097

(a) "ADULT" MEANS A PERSON WHO IS EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR
OLDER.
(b) "ANAL INTERCOURSE" MEANS CONTACT BETWEEN HUMAN
BEINGS OF THE GENITAL ORGANS OF ONE AND THE ANUS OF ANOTHER.
(c) "COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY" MEANS PERFORMING OR
OFFERING OR AGREEING TO PERFORM ANY ACT OF SEXUAL INTERCOURSE,
FELLATIO, CUNNILINGUS, MASTURBATION, OR ANAL INTERCOURSE WITH
ANOTHER WHO IS NOT THE PERSON'S SPOUSE FOR WHICH THE PERSON
GIVES, PROMISES, OR RECEIVES ANYTHING OF VALUE.
(d) "CUNNILINGUS" MEANS ANY ACT OF ORAL STIMULATION OF THE
VULVA OR CLITORIS.
(e) "FELLATIO" MEANS ANY ACT OF ORAL STIMULATION OF THE
PENIS.
(f) "MASTURBATION" MEANS STIMULATION OF THE GENITAL
ORGANS BY MANUAL OR OTHER BODILY CONTACT EXCLUSIVE OF SEXUAL
INTERCOURSE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-7-201.3 as
follows:
18-7-201.3. Affirmative defense - human trafficking -
expungement of record protective order - definitions.
(1) A person charged with prostitution, as described in section
18-7-201 or any corresponding municipal code or ordinance, for an
offense committed on or after July 1, 2015, which offense was committed
as a direct result of being a victim of human trafficking, may assert as an
affirmative defense that he or she is a victim of human trafficking as
defined in subsection (4) of this section. To assert the affirmative defense
pursuant to this subsection (1), the person charged with the offense must
-4- SB26-097

demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she was a
victim of human trafficking at the time of the offense. An official
determination or documentation is not required to assert an affirmative
defense pursuant to this subsection (1), but official documentation from
a federal, state, local, or tribal government agency indicating that the
defendant was a victim at the time of the offense creates a presumption
that his or her participation in the offense was a direct result of being a
victim.
(2) Repealed.
(3) At the request of a person who asserted the affirmative defense
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court may at any time issue
a protective order concerning protecting the confidentiality of the person
asserting the affirmative defense.
(4) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Human trafficking" means an offense described in part 5 of
article 3 of this title or any conduct that, if it occurred prior to the
enactment of such part 5, would constitute an offense of human
trafficking pursuant to part 5 of article 3 of this title.
(b) "Victim of human trafficking" means a "victim" as defined in
section 18-3-502 (12).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-201.4
as follows:
18-7-201.4. Victim of human trafficking of a minor for sexual
servitude - provision of services - reporting.
If a law enforcement officer encounters a person who is under
eighteen years of age OLD and who is engaging in any conduct that would
be a violation of section 18-7-201, 18-7-202, 18-7-204, or 18-7-207, AS
-5- SB26-097

THE SECTIONS EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, or a prostitution-related
offense CORRESPONDING COMMERCIAL-SEXUAL-ACTIVITY-RELATED
VIOLATION pursuant to a county or municipal ordinance, AS THE
ORDINANCE EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, and there is probable cause
to believe that the minor is a victim of human trafficking of a minor for
sexual servitude pursuant to section 18-3-504, the law enforcement
officer or agency shall immediately report a suspected violation of human
trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude to the appropriate county
department of human or social services or the child abuse reporting
hotline system created pursuant to section 26-5-111. The county
department of human or social services shall subsequently follow the
reporting requirements set forth in section 19-3-308 (4)(c).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-7-202 as
follows:
18-7-202. Soliciting for prostitution.
(1) A person commits soliciting for prostitution if he:
(a) Solicits another for the purpose of prostitution; or
(b) Arranges or offers to arrange a meeting of persons for the
purpose of prostitution; or
(c) Directs another to a place knowing such direction is for the
purpose of prostitution.
(2) Soliciting for prostitution is a petty offense. A person who is
convicted of soliciting for prostitution may be required to pay a fine of
not more than five thousand dollars in addition to any penalty imposed by
the court pursuant to section 18-1.3-501, which additional fine shall be
transferred to the state treasurer, who shall transfer the same to the
prostitution enforcement cash fund created in section 24-33.5-513.
-6- SB26-097

SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-203 as
follows:
18-7-203. Pandering.
(1) Any A person who does any of the following for money or
other thing of value commits pandering:
(a) Inducing a person by menacing or criminal intimidation to
commit prostitution; or ENGAGE IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY.
(b) Knowingly arranging or offering to arrange a situation in
which a person may practice prostitution.
(2) (a) Pandering under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) of this section is a class 5 felony. A person who is
convicted of pandering under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) of this section shall be required to pay a fine of not
less than five thousand dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars in
addition to any penalty imposed by the court pursuant to section
18-1.3-401. which additional fine shall be transferred to the state
treasurer, who shall transfer the same to the prostitution enforcement cash
fund created in section 24-33.5-513, C.R.S.
(b) Pandering pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section is a
class 2 misdemeanor. A person who is convicted of pandering shall be
required to pay a fine of not less than five thousand dollars and not more
than ten thousand dollars in addition to any penalty imposed by the court
pursuant to section 18-1.3-501, which additional fine shall be transferred
to the state treasurer, who shall transfer the same to the prostitution
enforcement cash fund created in section 24-33.5-513.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-7-204 as
follows:
-7- SB26-097

18-7-204. Keeping a place of prostitution.
(1) Any person who has or exercises control over the use of any
place which offers seclusion or shelter for the practice of prostitution and
who performs any one or more of the following commits keeping a place
of prostitution if he:
(a) Knowingly grants or permits the use of such place for the
purpose of prostitution; or
(b) Permits the continued use of such place for the purpose of
prostitution after becoming aware of facts or circumstances from which
he should reasonably know that the place is being used for purposes of
prostitution.
(2) Keeping a place of prostitution is a class 2 misdemeanor.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-7-205 as
follows:
18-7-205. Patronizing a prostitute.
(1) Any person who performs any of the following with a person
not his spouse commits patronizing a prostitute:
(a) Engages in an act of sexual intercourse or of deviate sexual
conduct with a prostitute; or
(b) Enters or remains in a place of prostitution with intent to
engage in an act of sexual intercourse or deviate sexual conduct.
(2) Patronizing a prostitute is a petty offense. A person who is
convicted of patronizing a prostitute may be required to pay a fine of not
more than five thousand dollars in addition to any penalty imposed by the
court pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 or 18-1.3-503, which additional fine
shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall transfer the same to
the prostitution enforcement cash fund created in section 24-33.5-513.
-8- SB26-097

SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-206 as
follows:
18-7-206. Pimping.
Any A person who knowingly lives on or is supported or
maintained in whole or in part by money or other thing of value earned,
received, procured, or realized by any other ANOTHER person through
prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY commits pimping, which is
a class 3 felony.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-7-207 as
follows:
18-7-207. Prostitute making display.
Any person who by word, gesture, or action endeavors to further
the practice of prostitution in any public place or within public view
commits a petty offense.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-209 as
follows:
18-7-209. Immunity from prostitution-related offenses -
victims - human trafficking of a minor for involuntary servitude -
human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude.
If probable cause exists to believe that a minor charged with a
prostitution-related activity pursuant to section 18-7-201, 18-7-202,
18-7-204, or 18-7-207, AS THE SECTIONS EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026,
or a prostitution-related CORRESPONDING COMMERCIAL-SEXUAL-
ACTIVITY-RELATED offense pursuant to a county or municipal ordinance,
AS THE ORDINANCE EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, was a victim of
human trafficking of a minor for involuntary servitude, pursuant to
section 18-3-503 (2), or human trafficking of a minor for sexual
-9- SB26-097

servitude, pursuant to section 18-3-504 (2), at the time of the offense
being charged, the minor is immune from criminal liability or juvenile
delinquency proceedings for such charges.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-235-108, amend
(5) as follows:
12-235-108. License - requirements - denial of license
application.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the director may
deny a license if the applicant has committed any act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under section 12-235-111 or if the director
determines, subsequent to the criminal history record check, that the
applicant was convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or received
a deferred sentence for a charge of unlawful sexual behavior as defined
in section 16-22-102, any prostitution-related offense, or a
human-trafficking-related offense as described in sections 18-3-503 and
18-3-504, whether or not the act was committed in Colorado.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-235-111, amend
(1)(m) as follows:
12-235-111. Grounds for discipline - definitions.
(1) The director is authorized to take disciplinary action pursuant
to section 12-235-112 against any person who has:
(m) Been convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or
received a deferred sentence for a charge of unlawful sexual behavior as
defined in section 16-22-102, any prostitution-related offense, or any
human-trafficking-related offense as described in sections 18-3-503 and
18-3-504, whether or not the act was committed in Colorado;
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 13-10-126.
-10- SB26-097

SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-13-303, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(a) as follows:
16-13-303. Class 1 public nuisance.
(1) Every building or part of a building including the ground upon
which it is situate and all fixtures and contents thereof, every vehicle, and
any real property shall be IS deemed a class 1 public nuisance when:
(a) Used as a public or private place of prostitution or used as a
place where the commission of soliciting for prostitution, as defined in
section 18-7-202, C.R.S.; pandering, as defined in section 18-7-203;
C.R.S.; keeping a place of prostitution, as defined in section 18-7-204,
C.R.S.; pimping, as defined in section 18-7-206; C.R.S.; or human
trafficking, as described in section 18-3-503 or 18-3-504, C.R.S., occurs;
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-13-304, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
16-13-304. Class 2 public nuisance.
(1) The following are deemed to be a class 2 public nuisance:
(b) Any public or private place or premises which THAT
encourages professional gambling, unlawful use, sale, or distribution of
imitation controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-420 (3),
C.R.S., drugs, controlled substances, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5),
C.R.S., or other drugs the possession of which is an offense under the
laws of this state, furnishing or selling intoxicating liquor to minors,
furnishing or selling fermented malt beverages to persons under the age
of twenty-one, solicitation for prostitution, or traffic in stolen property;
or
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1-410.7, amend
(1)(c) as follows:
-11- SB26-097

18-1-410.7. Vacating certain criminal convictions for victims
of human trafficking.
(1) (c) This section does not apply to a conviction if the individual
raised an affirmative defense described in section 18-7-201.3 or 18-3-504
(2.5) at trial and was still convicted after raising the defense.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1-712.5, amend
(2) and (4) as follows:
18-1-712.5. Immunity for sex workers and persons who are
victims of human trafficking for sexual servitude and who suffer or
report an assault - definition.
(2) A person is immune from arrest and prosecution for
prostitution as described in section 18-7-201, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2026, soliciting for prostitution as described in section 18-7-202,
AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, and a prostitute making display as
described in section 18-7-207, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, if the
person seeks assistance from a law enforcement officer, the 911 system,
or a medical provider and if the evidence for the charge of prostitution,
soliciting prostitution, or a prostitute making display was obtained as a
result of the person seeking assistance, as a result of the need for
assistance, or as a result of the reporting of assistance. This subsection (2)
also applies to equivalent municipal charges and arrests, PURSUANT TO
MUNICIPAL CODES OR ORDINANCES, AS THEY EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1,
2026.
(4) The immunity described in subsection (2) of this section for
the offense of prostitution is not grounds for suppression of evidence in
other criminal charges. Nothing in this section prohibits the prosecution
of a person for offenses OR MUNICIPAL CODE OR ORDINANCE VIOLATIONS
-12- SB26-097

other than those listed in subsection (2) of this section, or to limit the
ability of a district attorney or law enforcement officer to obtain or use
evidence from a report, recording, or any other statement provided
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to prosecute an offense other
than those listed in subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this section
prohibits the provision of immunity pursuant to other sections of law, as
applicable, including section 18-1-711.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-305, amend
(1.5)(a)(III) as follows:
24-31-305. Certification - issuance - renewal - revocation -
rules - definition.
(1.5) (a) The P.O.S.T. board shall deny certification to any person
who has been convicted of:
(III) Any A misdemeanor in violation of sections 18-7-201,
18-7-202, 18-7-203, 18-7-204, 18-7-302 and 18-7-601; C.R.S.;
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-707, amend
(1.5) as follows:
24-72-707. Sealing of criminal conviction records information
for offenses committed by victims of human trafficking.
(1.5) A person charged with or convicted of prostitution, as
described in section 18-7-201, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, or
any corresponding municipal code or ordinance, which offense AS IT
EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, THAT was committed as a direct result of
being a victim of human trafficking, as defined in section 18-7-201.3 (4),
may file a motion with the court for a sealing of the person's records.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11.8-109,
amend (2) as follows:
-13- SB26-097

29-11.8-109. Persons prohibited as licensees.
(2) For purposes of determining good moral character, the local
licensing authority may consider the criminal record of all applicants,
including, but not limited to, any conviction or guilty plea to a charge
based on acts of dishonesty, fraud, deceit, OR sexual misconduct, or
prostitution-related misconduct of any kind, whether or not the acts were
committed in this state.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11.8-112,
amend (2) as follows:
29-11.8-112. Duties of escort bureau.
(2) The escort bureau shall provide to each escort patron a written
contract for services. The contract shall MUST clearly state the name and
address of the escort and customer, the type of services to be performed,
the length of time such THE services shall ARE TO be performed, the total
amount of money such THE services will cost the escort patron, and any
special terms or conditions relating to the services to be performed. The
contract shall include a statement in clear and concise language that
prostitution is illegal in this state and that both parties to an act of
prostitution may be punished by both fine and imprisonment and that no
act of prostitution shall be performed in relation to the services for which
contracted. Each contract shall MUST be numbered and utilized in
numerical sequence by the escort bureau. The contract shall MUST be
signed by the escort patron and a copy furnished to him or her THE
PATRON. The escort bureau shall also retain copies of all such contracts,
and THE ESCORT BUREAU SHALL TRANSMIT one copy of each such contract
executed in any A calendar month shall be transmitted by the escort
bureau to the local licensing authority no later than ten days after the last
-14- SB26-097

day of such THE month. The local licensing authority shall treat such THE
contracts transmitted to them as open public records.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-15-401.4,
amend (4)(a)(IV)(C), (5)(b), and (5)(j) as follows:
30-15-401.4. Statewide policy to prevent the operation of illicit
massage businesses - local regulation authorized - background checks
required - legislative declaration - definitions.
(4) (a) If a local government adopts a resolution or ordinance to
establish business licensure requirements for massage facilities as set
forth in subsection (3)(a) of this section, the business licensure
requirements may only include:
(IV) Allowing a licensing authority or a licensing authority's
designee to deny an application if:
(C) The applicant or an owner, prospective owner, or employee
has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that
is accepted by the court for a felony or misdemeanor for solicitation of a
prostitute, as described in section 18-7-202; a human-trafficking-related
offense, as described in section 18-3-503 or 18-3-504; money laundering,
as described in section 18-5-309;
(5) A local government may adopt a resolution or ordinance to
prohibit activities to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses
that engage in human trafficking-related offenses as described in sections
18-3-503 and 18-3-504. Prohibited activities include:
(b) Advertising to a prospective client that services, including
prostitution, sexual acts, escort services, sexual services, or services
related to human trafficking disguised as legitimate services are available;
(j) Permitting a person in a massage facility to make an agreement
-15- SB26-097

with an employee or contractor to engage in any prostitution-related
COMMERCIAL-SEXUAL-ACTIVITY-RELATED offense in the massage facility;
or any other location;
SECTION 24. Effective date - applicability. This act takes
effect July 1, 2026, and applies to conduct occurring on or after said date.
SECTION 25. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-16- SB26-097